test/src/morphology/V-vuelgged_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - vueˊlǧǧed: # Verb 'to set off' - full paradigm
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Inf: vueˊlǧǧed
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuâlǥam
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuâlǥak
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuâlgg
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vueˊlǧǧep
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vueˊlǧǧveˊted
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [vuâˊlǧǧe, vueˊlǧǧe, vuâˊlǧǧe, vuäˊlǧǧe, vuäˊlǧǧa]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+4: vueˊljet
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vueˊlj
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [vuõˊlǧǧem, vuiˊlǧǧem]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vuõˊlǧǧiǩ, vuiˊlǧǧiǩ]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vuõˊlji, vueˊlji]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vuõˊljim, vuõˊljin vueˊljim, vueˊljin]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vuõˊljid, vueˊljid]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vuõˊlǧǧe, vuiˊlǧǧe, vueˊlǧǧe]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+4: vuõˊlǧǧeš
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuâlggam
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg1: [vuõˊljžem, vueˊljžem]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg2: [vuõˊljžiǩ, vueˊljžiǩ]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg3: [vuõˊljež, vueˊljež]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl1: [vuõˊljžep,vueˊljžep, vuõˊljžim, vueˊljžim]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl2: [vuõˊljžid, vueˊljžid] 
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl3: [vuõˊljže, vueˊljže]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+4: [vuõˊljžet, vueˊljžet]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+ConNeg: vuõˊljže
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg1: vuâlǥčem
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg2: vuâlǥčiǩ
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg3: vuâlǥči
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl1: [vuâlǥčim, vuâlǥčep]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl2: vuâlǥčid
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl3: vuâlǥče
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+4: vuâlǥčeš
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+ConNeg: vuâlǥče
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+Sg2: vueˊlj
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+Sg3: vuâlǥas
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+Pl1: vueˊlǧǧep
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+Pl2: vueˊlǧǧed
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+Pl3: vuâlǥǥaz
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+ConNeg: vuõlggu
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+ActEss: vueˊlǧǧmen
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Action: vueˊlǧǧem
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+PrsPrc: [vuõˊlǧǧi, vueˊlǧǧi]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+PrfPrc: vuâlggam
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: vuõlggum
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+VAbess: [vueˊljkani, vueˊljǩeännai]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+GerTemp: vueˊljeen
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+GerInstr: vueˊljeeˊl
     
     
     
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+PrfPrc: vueˊlǧǧâm
     
     
